Maryland, session 2026, HB0550.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
SUBTITLE 27. ACTION FOR DEPRIVATION OF CONSTITUTIONAL RIGHTS.
3–2701.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “FEDERAL LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER” MEANS AN OFFICER WHO
MAY:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0550*

HOUSE BILL 550
(1) MAKE AN ARREST WITH OR WITHOUT A WARRANT FOR
VIOLATIONS OF THE UNITED STATES CODE; AND
(2) CARRY FIREARMS IN THE PERFORMANCE OF THE OFFICER’S
DUTIES.
(C) “LAW” INCLUDES:
(1) THE U.S. CONSTITUTION;
(2) THE MARYLAND DECLARATION OF RIGHTS;
(3) THE MARYLAND CONSTITUTION;
(4) THE LAWS OF THE UNITED STATES; AND
(5) THE LAWS OF MARYLAND.
3–2702.
(A) AN AGGRIEVED PARTY MAY BRING AN ACTION AGAINST A FEDERAL LAW
ENFORCEMENT OFFICER WHO, UNDER COLOR OF LAW, DEPRIVES THE AGGRIEVED
PARTY OR CAUSES OR ALLOWS THE AGGRIEVED PARTY TO BE DEPRIVED OF A RIGHT,
A PRIVILEGE, OR AN IMMUNITY SECURED BY THE U.S. CONSTITUTION.
(B) (1) A DEFENDANT IN AN ACTION UNDER THIS SECTION MAY ASSERT A
DEFENSE OF ABSOLUTE OR QUALIFIED IMMUNITY TO THE SAME EXTENT AS A
PERSON SUED UNDER 42 U.S.C. § 1983 UNDER LIKE CIRCUMSTANCES.
(2) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO WAIVE OR ABROGATE
ANY DEFENSE OF SOVEREIGN IMMUNITY OTHERWISE AVAILABLE.
(C) A COURT MAY AWARD REASONABLE FEES AND COSTS, INCLUDING
ATTORNEY’S FEES AND EXPERT WITNESS FEES, TO A PREVAILING PLAINTIFF UNDER
THIS SECTION.
(D) AN ACTION UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE FILED WITHIN 5 YEARS
AFTER THE CAUSE OF ACTION ACCRUES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply retroactively and shall be applied to and interpreted to affect any cause of action
arising on or after March 1, 2025, and to any civil action pending on the date this Act
becomes effective.

HOUSE BILL 550 3
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.